Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,309
Moped; statutes; applicable.

Mopeds, their owners, and their operators shall be subject to the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, but shall be exempt from the requirements of the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act, the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, and the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act.

Laws 1979, LB 23, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 731, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,196;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 405;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 247;

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 104.

Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act, see section 60-101.

Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, see section 60-462.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.

Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, see section 60-569.